Washington statutes.
RCW 3.50.815

Criminal justice responsibilities—Interlocal agreements.

A city may meet the requirements of RCW 39.34.180 by entering into an interlocal agreement with the county in which the city is located or with one or more cities.

[ 2008 c 227 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Subheadings not law—2008 c 227: See notes following RCW 3.50.003.